Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.07
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Nonprofit Security Grant Program Act:

(1) Agency means the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency;

(2) Equipment means security equipment installed on real property, including any building or improvement, that is owned or leased by the nonprofit organization, including reinforced doors and gates, perimeter lighting, exterior and interior door locking systems, alarm systems, camera-based security systems, access-control systems, blast-resistant film for windows or shatter-resistant glass, lock-down systems, public-address systems, high-intensity lighting and alarms, and inspection and screening systems;

(3) Planning means those activities that are related to protecting a facility, the people within the facility, and the people with access to the facility and providing for their functional needs. The term includes developing and enhancing a nonprofit organization's security plans and protocols, emergency contingency plans, and evacuation or shelter-in-place plans and the materials that are required to conduct planning activities;

(4) Program means the Nebraska Nonprofit Security Grant Program created in section 81-829.08;

(5)(a) Qualified nonprofit organization means an organization that:

(i) Is exempt from federal income taxes under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, including any nonprofit organization created exclusively for religious purposes;

(ii) Is at high risk of a terrorist attack or at risk for hate crimes or attacks because of the nonprofit organization's ideology, beliefs, or mission; and

(iii)(A) Has applied for a federal nonprofit security grant and has not received funding for the same year the applicant is applying for a state grant under the program;

(B) Has been unable to apply for a federal nonprofit security grant; or

(C) Has a documented barrier or hardship related to the application for a federal nonprofit security grant; and

(b) Qualified nonprofit organization does not include:

(i) A hospital as defined in section 71-419;

(ii) A rural emergency hospital as defined in section 71-428.01; or

(iii) An institution of postsecondary education;

(6) Security personnel includes personnel who are contracted with or employed by the nonprofit organization; and

(7) Training means training that addresses a specific security threat or vulnerability. The term includes:

(a) Attendance and travel fees for training the nonprofit organization's staff or members;

(b) Security training and exercises or drills, including active shooter and shelter-in-place training, for the nonprofit organization's staff, members, and visitors; and

(c) Training-related expenses, including supplies, materials, and training equipment.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 15.